Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF459.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1412SV (1) 91 ss/ns S.F. 459 Section 1. Section 43.37, Code 2025, is amended to read as 1 follows: 2 43.37 Number of votes permitted per office ââ prohibited 3 methods . 4 1. The elector shall be permitted to vote for no more 5 candidates for any office than there are persons to be elected 6 to the office. If an elector votes for more persons for any 7 office than the number permitted, the electorâs ballot shall 8 not be counted for that office. 9 2. a. An election in this state shall not be conducted 10 using ranked choice voting or instant runoff voting, including 11 an election for any statewide, local government, or other 12 office. 13 b. For purposes of this subsection: 14 (1) âLocal governmentâ means an incorporated city or town, 15 an unincorporated city or town, a county, a school, or any 16 other political subdivision of the state. 17 (2) âRanked choice votingâ or âinstant runoff votingâ means 18 a method of casting and tabulating votes in which a voter 19 ranks candidates in order of preference, tabulation of ballots 20 proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate 21 is elected or the candidate receiving the fewest votes is 22 defeated, votes are transferred from elected or defeated 23 candidates to a voterâs next-ranked candidate in order of 24 preference, and tabulation ends when a candidate receives the 25 majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected 26 equals the number of offices to be filled, as applicable. 27 Sec. 2. Section 49.93, Code 2025, is amended to read as 28 follows: 29 49.93 Number of votes for each office ââ prohibited methods . 30 1. For an office to which one person is to be elected, a 31 voter shall not vote for more than one candidate. If two or 32 more persons are to be elected to an office, the voter shall 33 vote for no more than the number of persons to be elected. If a 34 person votes for more than the permitted number of candidates, 35 -1- LSB 1412SV (1) 91 ss/ns 1/ 2 S.F. 459 the vote for that office shall not count. Valid votes cast on 1 the rest of the ballot shall be counted. 2 2. a. An election in this state shall not be conducted 3 using ranked choice voting or instant runoff voting, including 4 an election for any statewide, local government, or other 5 office. 6 b. For purposes of this subsection: 7 (1) âLocal governmentâ means an incorporated city or town, 8 an unincorporated city or town, a county, a school, or any 9 other political subdivision of the state. 10 (2) âRanked choice votingâ or âinstant runoff votingâ means 11 a method of casting and tabulating votes in which a voter 12 ranks candidates in order of preference, tabulation of ballots 13 proceeds in rounds such that in each round either a candidate 14 is elected or the candidate receiving the fewest votes is 15 defeated, votes are transferred from elected or defeated 16 candidates to a voterâs next-ranked candidate in order of 17 preference, and tabulation ends when a candidate receives the 18 majority of votes cast or the number of candidates elected 19 equals the number of offices to be filled, as applicable. 20